Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-844
Property belonging to city; exempt from taxation; when.

Land, buildings, money, debts due the city, real and personal property, and assets of every kind and description belonging to any city of the primary class shall be exempt from execution liens and sales and shall be exempt from taxation to the extent used for a public purpose. Judgments against a city of the primary class shall be paid out of the judgment fund or out of a special fund created for that purpose.

Laws 1963, c. 53, § 1, p. 232;

Laws 1988, LB 798, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 173, § 14.